apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <!-- imád : imádok : imádja : imádott : imádta -->
    <pardef n="imád__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ni</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>od</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jik</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>játok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ják</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>tam</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tál</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ott</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tunk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tatok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>tam</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tad</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tuk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tátok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ták</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>jak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>j</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jon</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>junk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jatok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>janak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>jam</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>d</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>játok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ják</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>hat</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pot"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ott</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ó</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- áll : állok : állja : állt -->
    <pardef n="áll__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ni</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>od</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>játok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ják</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>tam</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tál</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tunk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tatok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>talak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tad</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tuk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tátok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ták</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>jak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>j</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jon</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>junk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jatok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>janak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>jam</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>d</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>játok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ják</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>hat</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pot"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ó</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="aktivál"><i>aktivál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="alakítgat"><i>alakítgat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="álmodik"><i>álmodik</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ápol"><i>ápol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="árusít"><i>árusít</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bámul"><i>bámul</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bátorít"><i>bátorít</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bocsát"><i>bocsát</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="borítgat"><i>borítgat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="botol"><i>botol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="caplat"><i>caplat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="csavargat"><i>csavargat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="csillámol"><i>csillámol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="csíráztat"><i>csíráztat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="csucsujgat"><i>csucsujgat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deflorál"><i>deflorál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deprimál"><i>deprimál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dinamizál"><i>dinamizál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disszociálódik"><i>disszociálódik</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="durrogat"><i>durrogat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="egzaminál"><i>egzaminál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="expiál"><i>expiál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="férfiatlanít"><i>férfiatlanít</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fitymál"><i>fitymál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fogadtat"><i>fogadtat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forr"><i>forr</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gajdorász"><i>gajdorász</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="galvanizál"><i>galvanizál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gyurkál"><i>gyurkál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hajlítgat"><i>hajlítgat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hatálytalanít"><i>hatálytalanít</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hézagol"><i>hézagol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="húzkod"><i>húzkod</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="igazol"><i>igazol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inspirál"><i>inspirál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="járul"><i>járul</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="játszat"><i>játszat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="karakterizál"><i>karakterizál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kártalanít"><i>kártalanít</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kócol"><i>kócol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="konferál"><i>konferál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="korongol"><i>korongol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kotorász"><i>kotorász</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kuruzsol"><i>kuruzsol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lazít"><i>lazít</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lóbál"><i>lóbál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="markolász"><i>markolász</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="maszkol"><i>maszkol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="monologizál"><i>monologizál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="neutralizál"><i>neutralizál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nógat"><i>nógat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nyugtat"><i>nyugtat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="organizál"><i>organizál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="passzolgat"><i>passzolgat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="passzol"><i>passzol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pletykál"><i>pletykál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="produkál"><i>produkál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="puszilgat"><i>puszilgat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="remonstrál"><i>remonstrál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rugdos"><i>rugdos</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sokall"><i>sokall</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sorakoztat"><i>sorakoztat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="szárít"><i>szárít</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="szekularizál"><i>szekularizál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="szűkmarkúskodik"><i>szűkmarkúskodik</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="táplál"><i>táplál</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tát"><i>tát</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udvarol"><i>udvarol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ugaroltat"><i>ugaroltat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="várakoztat"><i>várakoztat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vontat"><i>vontat</i><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zsarol"><i>zsarol</i><par n="áll__vblex"/></e>
